Vermont, session 2025-2026, H932.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
(C) For the purposes of determining jurisdiction under subdivision
(3)(A) of this section subdivision (3), the following shall apply:
* * *
(vi) Forestry as referenced in subdivision (D) of this subdivision
(3) does not include conversion of land for nonexempt uses, such as for a
commercial or industrial purpose constituting development as defined in this
chapter.
* * *
(F) When development is proposed to occur on a parcel or tract of
land that is devoted to logging and forestry, only those portions of the parcel or
the tract that support the development shall be subject to regulation under this
chapter. Permits issued under this chapter shall not impose conditions on,
apply to, or restrict or conflict with the Acceptable Management Practices for
VT LEG #390253 v.1

No. 161 Page 2 of 3
2026
Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in Vermont on other portions of
the parcel or tract of land that do not support the development.
* * *
(44) “Wood products manufacturer” means a manufacturer that
aggregates wood products from forestry operations and adds value through
processing or marketing in the wood products supply chain or directly to
consumers through retail sales. “Wood products manufacturer” includes
sawmills; veneer mills; pulp mills; pellet mills; and producers of firewood,
woodchips, mulch, and fuel wood; and log and pulp concentration yards.
“Wood products manufacturer” does not include facilities that purchase,
market, and resell finished goods, such as wood furniture, wood pellets, and
milled lumber, without first receiving wood products from forestry operations.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(ee) No permit or permit amendment is required for logging and forestry
below the elevation of 2,500 feet that will not conflict with or violate any
condition of a permit issued pursuant to this chapter. Permits shall include a
statement that logging and forestry activities consistent with this subsection
and below the elevation of 2,500 feet are exempt from amendment jurisdiction.
VT LEG #390253 v.1

No. 161 Page 3 of 3
2026
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390253 v.1